Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201444-8902
Applicability of act.

Except as provided in sections
44-8905, 44-8906, and 44-8907, the Standard Valuation Act applies to those
policies and contracts issued on or after the operative date of the valuation
manual designated in subsection (2) of section 44-8908.

Laws 2014, LB755, § 2.